Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1508.01
Violations of Environmental Protection Act, Integrated Solid Waste Management Act, or Livestock Waste Management Act; criminal penalties.

(1) Any person who violates the Environmental Protection Act, the Integrated Solid Waste Management Act, or the Livestock Waste Management Act by knowingly and willfully committing any of the following offenses shall be guilty of a Class IV felony:

(a) Violating any water pollution control law, rule, or regulation adopted pursuant to the National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System created by the Clean Water Act, as amended, 33 U.S.C. 1251 et seq., or any permit or permit condition or limitation or failing to obtain a permit as required by the Environmental Protection Act, the Integrated Solid Waste Management Act, or the Livestock Waste Management Act;

(b) Violating any air pollution control law, rule, regulation, permit, license, or permit or license condition or limitation;

(c) Violating any hazardous waste control law, rule, regulation, permit, license, or permit or license condition or limitation;

(d) Violating any mineral production, mineral exploration, or injection control law, rule, regulation, permit, license, or permit or license condition or limitation;

(e) Making any false statement, representation, or certification in any application, label, manifest, record, report, plan, or other document required to be filed or maintained by the Environmental Protection Act, the Integrated Solid Waste Management Act, or the Livestock Waste Management Act or the rules or regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to such acts;

(f) Falsifying, tampering with, or rendering inaccurate any monitoring device or method used or required for compliance with any permit or license or the Environmental Protection Act, the Integrated Solid Waste Management Act, or the Livestock Waste Management Act or the rules or regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to such acts; or

(g) Transporting hazardous waste to an unpermitted facility.

(2) Any person who violates the Environmental Protection Act, the Integrated Solid Waste Management Act, or the Livestock Waste Management Act by knowingly and willfully committing any of the following offenses shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor:

(a) Violating any solid waste control law, rule, regulation, permit, license, or permit or license condition or limitation; or

(b) Violating any livestock waste control law, rule, regulation, permit, license, or permit or license condition or limitation.

(3) Any person who knowingly and willfully violates any other provision of the Environmental Protection Act, the Integrated Solid Waste Management Act, or the Livestock Waste Management Act or any rule or regulation adopted and promulgated pursuant to such acts shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

(4) Each violation under this section shall be actionable. In case of a continuing violation, each day shall constitute a separate offense. Any person who knowingly and willfully violates this section shall be subject to personal liability under this section. In assessing the amount of any fine, the court shall consider the degree and extent of the violation, the size of the operation, and any economic benefit derived from noncompliance.

Laws 1994, LB 570, § 10;

Laws 1998, LB 1209, § 25.

Integrated Solid Waste Management Act, see section 13-2001.

Livestock Waste Management Act, see section 54-2416.